Utah statutes.
19-6-705.   Powers and duties of the executive secretary.

(1)  The executive secretary shall:

(a)  administer and enforce the rules and orders of the board;

(b)  issue and revoke registration numbers for DIYer used oil collection centers and used oil collection centers;

(c)  after public notice and opportunity for a public hearing:

(i)  issue or modify a permit under this part;

(ii)  deny a permit when the executive secretary finds the application is not complete; and

(iii)  revoke a permit issued under this section upon a finding the permit holder has failed to ensure compliance with this part;

(d) (i)  coordinate with federal, state, and local government, and other agencies, including entering into memoranda of understanding, to ensure effective regulation of used oil under this part, minimize duplication of regulation, and encourage responsible recycling of used oil; and

(ii)  as the department finds appropriate to the implementation of this part, enter into contracts with local health departments to carry out specified functions under this part and be reimbursed by the department in accordance with the contract;

(e)  require forms, analyses, documents, maps, and other records as the executive secretary finds necessary to permit and inspect an operation regulated under this part;

(f)  establish a toll-free telephone line to provide information to the public regarding management of used oil and locations of used oil collection centers; and

(g)  accept, receive, and administer grants or other funds or gifts from public and private agencies, including the federal government, for the purpose of carrying out any of the functions of this part.

(2)  The executive secretary may:

(a)  authorize any employee of the division to enter any facility regulated under this part at reasonable times and upon presentation of credentials for the purpose of inspection, audit, or sampling of the used oil site or facility, records, operations, or product;

(b)  direct a person whose activities are regulated under this part to take samples for a stated purpose and cause them to be analyzed at that person's expense; and

(c)  as authorized by the board under this part, enforce board rules by issuing orders which the board may subsequently amend or revoke.

